District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

17-101

Appeal from District of Columbia Court of Appeals; filing, form and contents of petition

Repealed.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 565, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 146a1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 17-101 to 17-104.

Editor's Notes

Section 29 of D.C. Law 15-354 provided that Title 17 is designated Title 17 of the District of Columbia Official Code.

Section 29 of D.C. Law 15-354 provided that Title 17 is designated Title 17 of the District of Columbia Official Code.